Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20202-4119
Commission; use of funds; restrictions.

No funds collected by the commission shall be expended directly or indirectly to promote or oppose any candidate for public office or to influence state legislation. The commission shall not expend more than twenty-five percent of its annual budget to influence federal legislation.

Laws 2020, LB803, § 19.